Louisiana, session 2026, HB691.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:49.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§49.2. Systematic alien verification for entitlements program review
A. For purposes of this Section, "SAVE" means the Systematic Alien
Verification for Entitlements program administered by the U.S. Department of
Homeland Security.
B.(1) The secretary shall annually submit to SAVE a check against every
registrant in the state voter registration computer system for which the requisite state
data exists. The data shall be submitted prior to one hundred eighty days before a
regularly scheduled federal general election.
(2) The secretary shall submit the name of every potential noncitizen
registrant to the division of election integrity for investigation.
C. Upon receipt of the name of a potential noncitizen registrant from the
secretary, the division of election integrity shall conduct an investigation. If the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 691 ENROLLED
division determines that there may be a noncitizen registrant in the state voter
registration computer system, the division shall submit the findings of the
investigation to the appropriate prosecutorial agency for further investigation or
prosecution.
D. The secretary shall transmit any noncitizen matches verified by the
division of election integrity to the appropriate parish registrar of voters to challenge
the individual's registration in accordance with R.S. 18:193.
E. The secretary shall include the following information in the annual report
to the legislature provided for in R.S. 18:18(A)(4):
(1) The number of records checked against SAVE data during the prior year.
(2) The number of registrants challenged as potential noncitizens.
(3) The number of registrants whose voter registration was cancelled as a
noncitizen.
(4) Any recommendations for statutory or administrative improvements to
ensure voter registration list accuracy.
F. All SAVE data and related voter information shall be processed in a
secure environment consistent with state and federal data protection standards and
in accordance with R.S. 18:154 and the Public Records Law.
G. This Section shall apply only if SAVE remains available without cost to
the state or subject to appropriation of funds by the legislature for this purpose.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.